Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 8 Distress Warrants

10-8-1.
Procedure as in attachment.

In case any officer shall distrain for taxes, or by any warrant of distress whatsoever, the goods and chattels of any person, he or she shall proceed in the same manner and be held to the same rules as directed in case of attachments in civil actions.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 558; G.L. 1909, ch. 300, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 350, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 531, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-8-1

.